Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-502
Charter convention; work, when deemed complete; charter, when published.

The city clerk shall not begin the publication of any proposed charter or amendments, as required by the constitution, in less than thirty days from the time of the completion of the work of said charter convention; and the work of said charter convention shall be deemed completed whenever its certified copy of charter or amendments shall be delivered to the city clerk, together with twenty-five correct copies thereof. Said copies shall when filed be open to the inspection of any elector of said city.

Laws 1913, c. 192, § 2, p. 570;

R.S.1913, § 5313;

C.S.1922, § 4536;

C.S.1929, § 19-502;

R.S.1943, § 19-502.